North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 10. North Carolina Drinking Water Act.
§ 130A-328.
Public water system operating permit and permit fee.

No person shall operate a community or non transient non-community water system who has not been issued an operating permit by the Department. A community or non transient non-community water system operating permit shall be valid from January 1 through
December 31 of each year unless suspended or revoked by the Department for cause. The Commission shall adopt rules concerning permit issuance and renewal and permit suspension and revocation. The annual fees in subsection (b) shall
be prorated on a monthly basis for permits obtained after January 1 of each year.

The following fees are imposed for the issuance or renewal of a permit to operate a community or non transient non-community water system; the fees are based on the number of persons served by the system:

Click to view

The following fees are imposed for the review of plans, specifications, and other information submitted to the Department for approval of construction or alteration of a public water system. The fees are based on the type of constructions or alteration
proposed:

Click to view

The Department may charge an administrative fee of up to one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for failure to pay the permit fee by January 31 of each year.

All fees collected under this section shall be applied to the costs of administering and enforcing this Article.

Fee Non Community Water Systems: Base fee: Non transient non-community $150 Community Water Systems: Number of Persons Served 50 or fewer $255 More than 50 but no more than 100 $270 More than 100 but no more than 200 $330 More than 200 but no more than
300 $350 More than 300 but no more than 400 $385 More than 400 but no more than 500 $420 More than 500 but no more than 750 $780 More than 750 but no more than 1000 $810 More than 1000 but no more than 2000 $840 More than 2000 but
no more than 3000 $870 More than 3000 but no more than 4000 $1350 More than 4000 but no more than 5000 $1460 More than 5000 but no more than 7500 $1925 More than 7500 but no more than 10,000 $2065 More than 10,000 but no more than
25,000 $2600 More than 25,000 but no more than 50,000 $2925 More than 50,000 but no more than 75,000 $4250 More than 75,000 but no more than 100,000 $4675 More than 100,000 but no more than 250,000 $5100 More than 250,000 but no more
than 500,000 $5525 More than 500,000 $5950

Distribution system: Fee Construction of water lines, less than 5000 linear feet $150 Construction of water lines, 5000 linear feet or more $200 Other construction or alteration to a distribution system $75 Ground water system: Construction of a new ground
water system or adding a new well $200 Alteration to an existing ground water system $100 Surface Water system: Construction of a new surface water treatment facility $100 Alteration to an existing surface water treatment facility
$150 Water System Management Plan review $75 Miscellaneous changes or maintenance not covered above $50

History.
1991, c. 576, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 811, s. 6; c. 1039, s. 11; 2006-66, s. 11.7(a).

§ 130A-329.
Reporting.

Reports required to be submitted under this Article or under rules adopted by the Commission shall be submitted electronically on a form specified by the Department. The Department may waive the requirement for electronic submission of a report if the
water system demonstrates that it lacks the technical capability to report electronically.

History.
2008-143, s. 12.

§§ 130A-330 through 130A-332.

Reserved for future codification purposes.